Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Vacancies

6-31-201. Vacancies in council.

A vacancy shall exist if a council member:

Resigns;

Dies;

Moves the member's residence from the district in which the council member was elected;

Has been continuously disabled for a period of six (6) months so as to prevent the council member from discharging the duties of such office;

Fails to attend sixty percent (60%) of regular council meetings in any period of six (6) consecutive months;

Accepts any state, county or other municipal office or position of employment that is filled by public election or that is remunerative, except as a notary public or member of the national guard; or

Is convicted of malfeasance or misfeasance in office, a felony, a violation of the charter, or a violation of the election laws of the state.

A vacancy shall be filled within thirty (30) days, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining council members, the appointee to serve until the next regular city or county election, whichever is first held. If a tie vote by the council to fill a vacancy is unbroken for thirty (30) days, the mayor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. No appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made within sixty (60) days prior to any regular city election.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.13; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; 1972, ch. 494, § 1; 1974, ch. 755, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3114.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).